Utah, session 2026, HB583.
Section 1. Section 20A-7-105.5 is enacted to read:20A-7-105.5. Signature curing -- Process -- Affidavit required.(1)This section applies only to the manual initiative process and the manual referendum process.(2)If, under Subsection 20A-1-1002(1)(a), (b), or (c), a county clerk declares invalid the signature of an individual who signs an initiative petition or referendum petition because the county clerk determines that the individual's signature does not appear substantially similar to the signature on file in the statewide voter registration database, the county clerk shall:(a)contact the individual in accordance with Subsection (6); and(b)inform the individual that:(i)the individual's signature was declared invalid; and(ii)in order for the signature to be counted as valid, the individual is required to timely deliver to the county clerk a signed and completed affidavit that complies with the requirements described in Subsection (3).(3)The affidavit described in Subsection (2)(b)(ii) shall include:(a)an attestation that the individual signed the initiative petition or referendum petition;(b)a space for the individual to enter the individual's printed name, residential address, phone number, and, if available, email address;(c)a space for the individual to sign the affidavit;(d)a statement that, by signing the affidavit, the individual authorizes the lieutenant governor's and county clerk's use of the individual's signature on the affidavit for voter identification purposes; and(e)a check box accompanied by language in substantially the following form: "I am a voter with a qualifying disability under the Americans with Disabilities Act that impacts my ability to sign my name consistently. I can provide appropriate documentation upon request. To discuss accommodations, I can be contacted at __________________."(4)An individual described in Subsection (2) shall, to have the individual's signature on an initiative petition or referendum petition counted as valid, deliver to the county clerk a signed and completed affidavit no later than 31 calendar days after the day on which the county clerk receives the initiative packet or referendum packet containing the individual's signature.(5)An election officer who receives a signed and completed affidavit under Subsection (4) shall immediately:(a)scan the signature on the affidavit electronically and keep the signature on file in the statewide voter registration database;(b)if the county clerk timely receives the affidavit under Subsection (4), count the individual's signature as valid; and(c)if the check box described in Subsection (3)(e) is checked, comply with the alternate verification process described in Subsection 20A-7-106(3).(6)(a)A county clerk shall, within two business days after the day on which an individual's signature is declared invalid, notify the individual of the invalidity and the reason for the invalidity by phone, mail, email, or, if consent is obtained on the individual's voter registration form, text message.(b)The county clerk shall ensure that the notice described in Subsection (6)(a) includes:(i)if communicating the notice by mail, a printed copy of the affidavit described in Subsection (3) and a courtesy reply envelope;(ii)if communicating the notice electronically, a link to a copy of the affidavit described in Subsection (3) or information on how to obtain a copy of the affidavit; or(iii)if communicating the notice by phone, either during a direct conversation with the individual or in a voicemail, arrangements for the individual to receive a copy of the affidavit described in Subsection (3), either in person from the county clerk's office, by mail, or electronically.(7)A county clerk may not count as valid the signature of an individual whom the county clerk contacts under Subsection (2) unless, no later than the deadline described in Subsection (4), the county clerk receives a signed and completed affidavit from the individual under Subsection (4).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.